Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1973.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; SWEET POTATO COMFORT PIE.new text end new text begin $500,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the Board of Directors of the Minnesota Humanities Center for a grant to Sweet Potato Comfort Pie for programming that celebrates traditional food and uses culinary arts, storytelling, and other creative forms of culture-sharing to celebrate and educate communities on culture and history. new text end